Hawaii, session 2026, HB1893.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 302A-706, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  There is established within the department the teacher national board certification incentive program to recognize and support exemplary teaching practice by supporting all public school teachers, including public charter school teachers, who have achieved national board certification under the certification program of the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards. The teacher national board certification incentive program shall provide: (1)  A [$5,000] $10,000 bonus per year for each public school teacher, including each public charter school teacher, who maintains current national board certification; (2)  $1,500 upon completing all components of the certification program of the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards; (3)  A reimbursement of the remainder of the national board certification application fee upon achievement of national board certification; and (4)  An additional $5,000 bonus per year for each public school teacher, including each public charter school teacher, who maintains current national board certification and who teaches at: (A)  A school in a focus, priority, or superintendent's zone, or other similar designation, as determined by the department; (B)  A school with a high turnover rate, as determined by the department; or (C)  A hard-to-fill school, as determined by the department." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________